Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.21.370

State and federal background checks of license applicants and licensees of occupations under local licensing authority.

(1) For the purpose of receiving criminal history record information by code city officials, code cities may:

(a) By ordinance, require a state and federal background investigation of license applicants or licensees in occupations specified by ordinance;

(b) By ordinance, require a federal background investigation of code city employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the code city, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults;

(c) Require a state criminal background investigation of code city employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the code city, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults; and

(d) Require a criminal background investigation conducted through a private organization of code city employees, applicants for employment, volunteers, vendors, and independent contractors, who, in the course of their work or volunteer activity with the code city, may have unsupervised access to children, persons with developmental disabilities, or vulnerable adults.

(2) The investigation conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section shall consist of a background check as allowed through the Washington state criminal records privacy act under RCW 10.97.050, the Washington state patrol criminal identification system under RCW 43.43.832 through 43.43.834, and the federal bureau of investigation.

(3) The background checks conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section must be done through the Washington state patrol identification and criminal history section and may include a national check from the federal bureau of investigation, which shall be through the submission of fingerprints. The Washington state patrol shall serve as the sole source for receipt of fingerprint submissions and the responses to the submissions from the federal bureau of investigation, which must be disseminated to the code city.

(4) For a criminal background check conducted under subsection (1)(a) through (c) of this section, the code city shall transmit appropriate fees for a state and national criminal history check to the Washington state patrol, unless alternately arranged. The cost of investigations conducted under this section shall be borne by the code city.

(5) The authority for background checks outlined in this section is in addition to any other authority for such checks provided by law.

[ 2017 c 332 s 2; 2010 c 47 s 3.]